Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.210

Bureaus—Application procedure.

(1) Application procedure. An alien bank shall not establish and operate a bureau in this state unless it is authorized to do so and unless it has met the following conditions:

(a) It has filed with the director an application in such form and containing such information as shall be prescribed by the director;

(b) It has paid the fee required by law and established by the director pursuant to *RCW 30.08.095;

(c) It has received from the director a certificate authorizing the applicant bank to establish and operate a bureau in conformity herewith.

(2) Upon receipt of the bank's application, and the conducting of such examination or investigation as the director deems necessary and appropriate and being satisfied that the opening of such bureau will be consistent with the purposes of this chapter, the director may grant approval for the bureau and issue a certificate authorizing the alien bank to establish and operate a bureau in the state of Washington.

[ 1994 c 92 s 93; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 21. Formerly RCW 30.42.210.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.08.095 was repealed by 2013 c 76 s 32.